Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB590.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 215. Emergency Unemployment Compensation Assistance.--(a) The Governor shall hire additional employes or reassign employes from other Commonwealth departments, boards or 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 commissions, including full-time and part-time furloughed employes, in accordance with sections 501 and 502 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as "The Administrative Code of 1929," for the Office of Unemployment Compensation and unemployment compensation service centers to ensure that eligible claimants are able to receive the benefits provided under this act. The department shall hire additional employes or reassign Commonwealth employes under this subsection commensurate with need, if:(1) The Commonwealth enters an extended benefit period as defined by section 401-A(a).(2) A state of disaster emergency is declared or a declaration is renewed under 35 Pa.C.S. § 7301(c) (relating to general authority of Governor).(b) In determining whether the department needs to hire additional employes or reassign Commonwealth employes, the Governor, in conjunction with the secretary, shall consult with all of the following:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Labor and Industry Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Labor and Industry Committee of the House of Representatives.(c) The department shall hire additional employes or reassign Commonwealth employes under subsection (a) in a manner that preserves the health and safety of the employes at the Office of Unemployment Compensation and unemployment compensation service centers.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0590PN0598 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728